Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 6

Department of Correction

4-3-601. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of correction.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 373a30; Code 1932, § 255; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; 1955, ch. 102, § 1; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of correction, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2015, ch. 63, § 3 provided that the department of correction shall appear before the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government no later than October 1, 2015, to update the committee on the department’s progress in addressing the findings set forth in the September 2014 performance audit report.

Acts 2020, ch. 639, § 3 provided that the division of state audit within the office of the comptroller of the treasury shall submit a request for information to the department of correction regarding the department's progress in addressing the findings contained in the January 2020 performance audit report. The information received from the department is to be compiled by the division of state audit and submitted to the government operations joint evaluation committee on judiciary and government for review. The department shall appear before the joint evaluation committee no later than December 31, 2021, to update the committee on its progress in addressing the findings contained in the performance audit report as contained in the department's response to the information submitted to it by the division of state audit in accordance with this section.

Cross-References. Creation of the department of correction, §4-3-101.

4-3-602. Commissioner — Appointment — Qualifications — Salary — Expenses — Secretary and other employees.

The department of correction is under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of correction.

It is the duty of the governor to appoint a suitable person to the position of commissioner of correction, who shall serve for a term coeval with that of the governor, or until the commissioner's successor is appointed and qualified. In the case of a vacancy in the office, it is the duty of the governor to appoint a suitable person to fill the office for the unexpired term. In order to be qualified for the office, a person shall be not less than twenty-five (25) years of age, a person of good character, and a person with training and experience in institutional operation and management in similar activities. The commissioner, upon the commissioner's appointment, shall take the oath required by law of other state officers.

The commissioner shall receive as compensation for the commissioner's services a salary to be fixed by the governor as provided in § 8-23-101, payable monthly upon warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration, and also the commissioner's traveling expenses incurred in official business, when itemized and approved by the governor.

The commissioner shall be provided with a suitable office, and with such furniture, supplies, books and appliances as may be necessary, the expense thereof to be audited and paid like other state expenses.

The commissioner is authorized to appoint:

A secretary and stenographer for the department, who shall have charge of and keep a record of the transactions of the department and all books and accounts, and perform such other duties as may be assigned to the secretary and stenographer by the commissioner, and shall receive a salary payable monthly upon warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration; and

Such other employees as may be necessary to enable the department to efficiently discharge its duties.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, §§ 3, 4, 7; 1921, ch. 1, § 1; 1923, ch. 7, §§ 2, 58; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 5, 42; Shan. Supp., §§ 312b3-312b6, 312b9, 373a32; Code 1932, §§ 257, 372-375, 378; Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 2, 24; 1939, ch. 11, § 2; 1939, ch. 178, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 38, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 373, 374, 378; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 252, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 32, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-603 — 4-605, 4-609; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 887, § 2.

Cross-References. Oaths of office, §§8-18-107 --8-18-114.

4-3-603. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner is the executive officer of the department of correction and has the immediate charge of the management and government of the institutions of the department, and the commissioner shall devote the commissioner's entire time and attention to the duties of the commissioner's position.

In addition to any other duties provided by law, when it appears to the commissioner, in the commissioner's sole discretion, that the available facilities and institutions of the department that are designed for the custody of inmates are overcrowded, the commissioner shall endeavor to alleviate such overcrowded conditions by contracting with local governmental entities, when possible, for the care, custody, and control in local jails, workhouses, penal farms or other such facilities, of inmates who have been committed to the department, or by any other means permitted by law.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1-3, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b7; Code 1932, § 376; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 344, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-606.

4-3-604. Investigations by commissioner.

The commissioner may make such investigations as the commissioner may deem necessary to the performance of the commissioner's duties, and to that end the commissioner shall have the same power as a judge of the court of general sessions to administer oaths and to enforce the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of books and papers.

The commissioner shall keep a record of such investigations, stating the time, place, character or subject, witnesses summoned and examined, and the commissioner's conclusions.

In matters involving the conduct of an officer, a stenographic report of the evidence shall be taken and a copy thereof with all documents introduced kept on file at the office of the department.

The fees of witnesses for attendance and travel shall be the same as in the circuit court, but no officer or employee of the institution under investigation shall be entitled to such fees.

Any judge of the circuit court, either in term time or in vacation, upon application of the commissioner, may compel the attendance of witnesses, the production of books or papers and the giving of testimony before the commissioner, by a judgment for contempt or otherwise, in the same manner as in cases before a circuit court.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 25; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b48; Code 1932, § 417; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-652.

4-3-605. Organization of department.

The commissioner of correction has the authority, with the approval of the governor, to organize the work of the department under such divisions as may be necessary to carry it on most efficiently and economically.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 43; Shan. Supp., § 373a104; Code 1932, § 323; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-607.

Cross-References. Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-606. Powers and duties of department.

The department of correction shall exercise all the rights, powers and duties described in chapter 6 of this title and otherwise vested by law in the department, the commissioner, and the commissioner's officers, assistants and employees.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 58; 1939, ch. 11, § 36; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.57 (Williams, § 255.61); modified; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-311.

4-3-607. Record of transactions.

A record of the transactions of the department of correction shall be kept by the commissioner, or under the commissioner's direction by the secretary.

Acts 1919, ch. 39, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Shan. Supp., § 312b8; Code 1932, § 377; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-608.

4-3-608. Local jails — Approval of construction plans.

All plans for new jails shall, before the adoption of the same by the county or city authorities, be submitted to the commissioner for suggestions and criticism.

Acts 1895, ch. 193, § 2; Shan., § 2674; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 42; Code 1932, § 4571; impl. am. Acts 1947, ch. 13, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 102, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-626.

4-3-609. Exercise of police powers by employees.

Those employees of the department of correction as the commissioner shall designate who have been trained in the use of firearms are vested with the powers and authority of law enforcement officers, including the authority to carry weapons, and may exercise such powers and authority while performing special details and assignments in the course of their duties as authorized by the commissioner. These instances may include the search for and apprehension of escapees, transporting inmates, assisting other law enforcement agencies, and other functions while on duty and under the supervision of the department.

Those employees of the department of correction appointed as special agents or as director of internal affairs and who have successfully completed law enforcement training in accordance with internal standards, including firearms training and successful completion of the Tennessee bureau of investigation's basic agent training, shall be fully vested and sworn by the commissioner as full-time law enforcement officers. The department's internal standards shall include, at a minimum, forty (40) hours initial training and eight (8) hours annual in-service training in firearms qualification administered by an instructor with certification from the Tennessee Correction Academy's firearms instructor program or from a police firearms instructor training program conducted or sanctioned by the federal bureau of investigation or the National Rifle Association. These agents and director shall have full authority to investigate and enforce the laws of the state and their mission shall focus on matters relative to the department of correction as well as those matters assisting other local, state, and federal agencies. These agents and director shall be so commissioned to carry weapons in the course of their duties and as is consistent with applicable standards for law enforcement personnel.

Persons employed by the department of correction as internal affairs special agents or as an internal affairs director shall have the full power to administer oaths and take oral and written statements.

The commissioner shall also establish internal procedures concerning appropriate exercise of the powers and authority vested by this section.

Acts 1980, ch. 485, § 1; 1985, ch. 10, § 1; 2002, ch. 525, § 1; 2009, ch. 191, § 1; 2012, ch. 603, § 1.

4-3-610. Assistance in acquiring dogs for detection of drugs.

The state of Tennessee, acting though the commissioner and department of correction, is authorized to assist counties and municipalities in acquiring dogs trained to detect marijuana and other illicit substances for use in jails and workhouses for the purposes set out in § 41-1-118.

Sheriffs, police chiefs and other local law enforcement officials are encouraged to utilize the dogs provided for in subsection (a).

Acts 1983, ch. 120, § 3.

4-3-611. Disclosure of the death of persons in the custody of the department of correction.

The commissioner of correction shall provide a report of any death of any person in the custody of the department at a department facility within ten (10) business days of the death of such person to the state senator and representative representing such person. The legislators representing such person shall be determined by the home address of the person in the state. This section shall not apply to the deaths of persons who were not residents of Tennessee prior to being placed in the custody of the department.

Acts 2005, ch. 168, § 1.

4-3-612. Contribution to funeral expenses of correctional employee killed in line of duty.

This section shall be known and may be cited as the “Debra Johnson Act.”

The department of correction may, if the commissioner of correction deems it appropriate, contribute up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) in state funds toward the funeral and burial expenses, as defined in § 1-3-105, of any correctional employee killed in the line of duty.

Acts 2020, ch. 779, § 1.